Utah statutes.
59-2-301.4.   Definition -- Assessment of property after a reduction in value -- Other factors affecting fair market value -- County legislative body authority to reduce value or issue a refund after a valuation reduction.

(1)  As used in this section, "valuation reduction" means a reduction in the value of property on appeal if that reduction was made:

(a)  within the three years before the January 1 of the year in which the property is being assessed; and

(b)  by a:

(i)  county board of equalization in a final decision;

(ii)  the commission in a final unappealable administrative order; or

(iii)  a court of competent jurisdiction in a final unappealable judgment or order.

(2)  In assessing the fair market value of property subject to a valuation reduction, a county assessor shall consider in the assessor's determination of fair market value:

(a)  any additional information about the property that was previously unknown or unaccounted for by the assessor that is made known on appeal; and

(b)  whether the reasons for the valuation reduction continue to influence the fair market value of the property.

(3)  This section does not prohibit a county assessor from including as part of a determination of the fair market value of property any other factor affecting the fair market value of the property.

(4) (a)  Subject to the other provisions of this Subsection (4), for a calendar year, a county legislative body may reduce the value of property, or issue a refund of property taxes paid, if:

(i)  a county board of equalization, the commission, or a court of competent jurisdiction makes a valuation reduction with respect to the property;

(ii)  the property is assessed in the next calendar year at a value that is at least five times greater than the value established at the time of the valuation reduction; and

(iii)  the county legislative body determines that the assessed value described in Subsection (4)(a)(ii) exceeds fair market value.

(b)  A county legislative body may make a reduction or refund under Subsection (4)(a) if an owner of the property:

(i)  applies to the county legislative body; and

(ii)  has not filed an appeal with the county board of equalization under Section 59-2-1004 or the commission under Section 59-2-1006 with respect to the property for the calendar year in which the owner applies to the county legislative body under Subsection (4)(b)(i).

(c)  A reduction described in Subsection (4)(a):

(i)  may be made if the property taxes have not been paid for the calendar year for which an owner applies to the county legislative body under Subsection (4)(b)(i); and

(ii)  is in an amount to ensure that the property is assessed at fair market value.

(d)  A refund described in Subsection (4)(a):

(i)  may be made if the property taxes have been paid for the calendar year for which an owner applies to the county legislative body under Subsection (4)(b)(i); and

(ii)  is in an amount to ensure that the property is taxed at a uniform and equal rate on the basis of its fair market value.



Amended by Chapter 248, 2013 General Session

